District of Columbia statutes.
7-2505.01

Sales and transfers prohibited.

No person or organization shall sell, transfer or otherwise dispose of any firearm, destructive device or ammunition in the District except as provided in § 7-2502.10(c), § 7-2505.02, or § 7-2507.05.

History

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title V, § 501, 23 DCR 2464
Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-62, § 2, 24 DCR 5780

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-2508.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2351.
1973 Ed., § 6-1851.